Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article VIII Natural Resources

Section 1. Statement of Policy.

It is the policy of the State to encourage the settlement of its land and the development of its resources by making them available for maximum use consistent with the public interest.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Area licensing regulations have a reasonable relation to a conservation goal and therefore do not conflict with the state constitution. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

AS

38.05.082

can be amended to limit the issuance of state tidelands leases for fisheries development to residents of Alaska. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

Section 2. General Authority.

The legislature shall provide for the utilization, development, and conservation of all natural resources belonging to the State, including land and waters, for the maximum benefit of its people.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Reading AS 46.40.070(b) as vesting local officials with complete control over policy formulation would probably render the Alaska Coastal Management Act unconstitutional under Alaska Const., art. VIII, § 2. May 12, 1980 Op. Att’y Gen.

AS

38.05.082

can be amended to limit the issuance of state tidelands leases for fisheries development to residents of Alaska. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

Section 3. Common Use.

Wherever occurring in their natural state, fish, wildlife, and waters are reserved to the people for common use.

Section 4. Sustained Yield.

Fish, forests, wildlife, grasslands, and all other replenishable resources belonging to the State shall be utilized, developed, and maintained on the sustained yield principle, subject to preferences among beneficial uses.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Area licensing regulations have relation to the subject of fish conservation in that they are designed to enable the Department of Fish and Game to control the extent of fishing in various areas of Alaska, and thereby to meet the mandate of Alaska Const., art. VIII, § 4, to maintain our fish resources on the sustained yield principle. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

Section 5. Facilities and Improvements.

The legislature may provide for facilities, improvements, and services to assure greater utilization, development, reclamation, and settlement of lands, and to assure fuller utilization and development of the fisheries, wildlife, and waters.

Section 6. State Public Domain.

Lands and interests therein, including submerged and tidal lands, possessed or acquired by the State, and not used or intended exclusively for governmental purposes, constitute the state public domain. The legislature shall provide for the selection of lands granted to the State by the United States, and for the administration of the state public domain.

Section 7. Special Purpose Sites.

The legislature may provide for the acquisition of sites, objects, and areas of natural beauty or of historic, cultural, recreational, or scientific value. It may reserve them from the public domain and provide for their administration and preservation for the use, enjoyment, and welfare of the people.

Cross references. —

For state land and water restricted to use as public recreation areas and state parks, see AS 41.21; for game refuges and sanctuaries, range areas, and habitat areas, see AS 16.20.

Section 8. Leases.

The legislature may provide for the leasing of, and the issuance of permits for exploration of, any part of the public domain or interest therein, subject to reasonable concurrent uses. Leases and permits shall provide, among other conditions, for payment by the party at fault for damage or injury arising from noncompliance with terms governing concurrent use, and for forfeiture in the event of breach of conditions.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions implementing this section, see AS 38.05.

Section 9. Sales and Grants.

Subject to the provisions of this section, the legislature may provide for the sale or grant of state lands, or interests therein, and establish sales procedures. All sales or grants shall contain such reservations to the State of all resources as may be required by Congress or the State and shall provide for access to these resources. Reservation of access shall not unnecessarily impair the owners’ use, prevent the control of trespass, or preclude compensation for damages.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions implementing this section, see AS 38.05.

Section 10. Public Notice.

No disposals or leases of state lands, or interests therein, shall be made without prior public notice and other safeguards of the public interest as may be prescribed by law.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendment proposed by SJR 45 am H (1976) (public notice of land disposals) was rejected by voters.

Section 11. Mineral Rights.

Discovery and appropriation shall be the basis for establishing a right in those minerals reserved to the State which, upon the date of ratification of this constitution by the people of Alaska, were subject to location under the federal mining laws. Prior discovery, location, and filing, as prescribed by law, shall establish a prior right to these minerals and also a prior right to permits, leases, and transferable licenses for their extraction. Continuation of these rights shall depend upon the performance of annual labor, or the payment of fees, rents, or royalties, or upon other requirements as may be prescribed by law. Surface uses of land by a mineral claimant shall be limited to those necessary for the extraction or basic processing of the mineral deposits, or for both. Discovery and appropriation shall initiate a right, subject to further requirements of law, to patent of mineral lands if authorized by the State and not prohibited by Congress. The provisions of this section shall apply to all other minerals reserved to the State which by law are declared subject to appropriation.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions regarding mining rights, see
AS

38.05.185

—
38.05.283.

Section 12. Mineral Leases and Permits.

The legislature shall provide for the issuance, types and terms of leases for coal, oil, gas, oil shale, sodium, phosphate, potash, sulfur, pumice, and other minerals as may be prescribed by law. Leases and permits giving the exclusive right of exploration for these minerals for specific periods and areas, subject to reasonable concurrent exploration as to different classes of minerals, may be authorized by law. Like leases and permits giving the exclusive right of prospecting by geophysical, geochemical, and similar methods for all minerals may also be authorized by law.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions relating to leasing of mineral land, see AS

38.05.135

—

38.05.184

.

Section 13. Water Rights.

All surface and subsurface waters reserved to the people for common use, except mineral and medicinal waters, are subject to appropriation. Priority of appropriation shall give prior right. Except for public water supply, an appropriation of water shall be limited to stated purposes and subject to preferences among beneficial uses, concurrent or otherwise, as prescribed by law, and to the general reservation of fish and wildlife.

Cross references. —

See note to Alaska Const., art. VIII, § 15.

Section 14. Access to Navigable Waters.

Free access to the navigable or public waters of the State, as defined by the legislature, shall not be denied any citizen of the United States or resident of the State, except that the legislature may by general law regulate and limit such access for other beneficial uses or public purposes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The owner of the uplands has been stated to have the right of access for the purpose of navigation, but no right of possession of the land below high water mark as against another. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

In

Dalton v. Hazelet

, 182 F. 561 (9th Cir. 1910), it was recognized that the right of free and unobstructed access may be exercised by means of a wharf or other structure over shoal water from the upland property to deep water.
1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

The mere physical passage is not the only right involved in the right of access. The upland owner has the right to use the foreshore in such manner as is necessary for the complete enjoyment of his right. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Any use of tidelands in such a manner as to deny the upland owner access to the navigable waters would be actionable. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 1.

Section 15. No Exclusive Right of Fishery.

No exclusive right or special privilege of fishery shall be created or authorized in the natural waters of the State. This section does not restrict the power of the State to limit entry into any fishery for purposes of resource conservation, to prevent economic distress among fishermen and those dependent upon them for a livelihood and to promote the efficient development of aquaculture in the State.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the limitation of entry into the fisheries of the state, see AS 16.43.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective October 14, 1972 (7th Legislature’s HCS CSSJR 10 (1971)) added the last sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section was derived from the White Act, former 48 U.S.C. §§ 221,
222.
1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Under the language of the White Act (former 48 U.S.C. § 222) the Secretary of Interior was prohibited from granting any exclusive or several right of fishery in favor of the Natives on the Karluk River on Kodiak Island. The court held that the prohibition against granting an exclusive right of fishery applied to commercial fishing by natives equally with fishing companies, and that the secretary could not grant to the occupants of an Indian rservation the privilege of exclusive commercial fishing rights.
190 Op. Att’y Gen. No. 9, citing
Hynes v. Grimes Packing Co., 337 U.S. 86, 69 S. Ct. 968, 93 L. Ed. 1231, 12 Alaska 348 (U.S. 1949).

AS

38.05.082

, which authorizes shore fishery leases, does not create an exclusive right of fishery and therefore is not unconstitutional under this section. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

AS

38.05.082

can be amended to limit the issuance of state tidelands leases for fisheries development to residents of Alaska. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

Section 16. Protection of Rights.

No person shall be involuntarily divested of his right to the use of waters, his interests in lands, or improvements affecting either, except for a superior beneficial use or public purpose and then only with just compensation and by operation of law.

Section 17. Uniform Application.

Laws and regulations governing the use or disposal of natural resources shall apply equally to all persons similarly situated with reference to the subject matter and purpose to be served by the law or regulation.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. VIII, § 10.

Opinions of attorney general. —

AS

38.05.082

can be amended to limit the issuance of state tidelands leases for fisheries development to residents of Alaska. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

Section 18. Private Ways of Necessity.

Proceedings in eminent domain may be undertaken for private ways of necessity to permit essential access for extraction or utilization of resources. Just compensation shall be made for property taken or for resultant damages to other property rights.